fr/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/fr.dic
acheter/b0p+
achever/b0p+
aciseler/b0p+
amener/b0p+
assener/b0p+
bégueter/b0p.
bèqueter/b0p+
celer/b0p+
champlever/b0p+
ciseler/b0p+
clairsemer/b0p+
clamecer/b0p+
congeler/b0p+
corseter/b0p+
crever/b0p+
crocheter/b0p+
débèqueter/b0p+
déceler/b0p+
décongeler/b0p+
dégeler/b0p+
dégrever/b0p+
démanteler/b0p+
démener/b0p+
dépecer/b0p+
désempeser/b0p+
désengrener/b0p+
écarteler/b0p+
égrener/b0p+
élever/b0p+
embrever/b0p+
emmener/b0p+
empeser/b0p+
encasteler/b0p+
enchifrener/b0p+
engrener/b0p+
enlever/b0p+
fileter/b0p+
fureter/b0p.
gangrener/b0p+
geler/b0p+
grener/b0p+
grever/b0p+
halener/b0p+
haleter/b0p.
harceler/b0p+
lever/b0p+
liserer/b0p+
malmener/b0p+
marteler/b0p+
mener/b0p+
modeler/b0p+
parachever/b0p+
parsemer/b0p+
peler/b0p+
peser/b0p+
préacheter/b0p+
prélever/b0p+
promener/b0p+
racheter/b0p+
ramener/b0p+
rapièceter/b0p+
receler/b0p+
receper/b0p+
recongeler/b0p+
regeler/b0p+
relever/b0p+
remarteler/b0p+
remmener/b0p+
remodeler/b0p+
rengrener/b0p+
repeser/b0p+
resemer/b0p+
ressemer/b0p+
semer/b0p+
sevrer/b0p+
souchever/b0p+
soulever/b0p+
soupeser/b0p+
surélever/b0p+
surgeler/b0p+
surmener/b0p+
sursemer/b0p+
